Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201246-1123
Districts; annual reports; contents.

Annual reports shall be submitted to the department by the district
personnel showing the actual number of applications received, the number of
applications approved, the number
of inspections made, and the name of all chemicals used in chemigation systems
within the district during the previous year.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 23;

Laws 2011, LB28, § 2.